USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn_canonical_LC.dix
<pardef n="uT/a__v">

<!-- verbal noun -->
<e r="LR"><p><l>anA</l><r>anA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>anA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>awA_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l>A_huA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>







 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_hue</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>

 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>awe_rahanA_hE</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>anA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ane</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="alApa"><i>alAp</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="ata"><i>at</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Badaka"><i>Badak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="baka"><i>bak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Bara"><i>Bar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="baxa"><i>bax</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bAzXa"><i>bAzX</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bicaka"><i>bicak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="BIga"><i>BIg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="bisAra"><i>bisAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="BOMka"><i>BOMk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="buna"><i>bun</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cahaka"><i>cahak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="CAna"><i>CAn</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cAta"><i>cAt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cewa"><i>cew</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Cika"><i>Cik</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Cipa"><i>Cip</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cOMka"><i>cOMk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="cuna"><i>cun</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="dakAra"><i>dakAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="dara"><i>dar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="diga"><i>dig</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="gAda"><i>gAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Gera"><i>Ger</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Gota"><i>Got</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Gumada"><i>Gumad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="gUzja"><i>gUzj</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="hata"><i>hat</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="hulasa"><i>hulas</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jAga"><i>jAg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Jamaka"><i>Jamak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jAzca"><i>jAzc</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="jIwa"><i>jIw</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Julasa"><i>Julas</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kadaka"><i>kadak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Kapa"><i>Kap</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Kataka"><i>Katak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="KIJa"><i>KIJ</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Kola"><i>Kol</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kuDa"><i>kuD</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="kUta"><i>kUt</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lahaka"><i>lahak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lawAda"><i>lawAd</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="lipa"><i>lip</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="luta"><i>lut</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="mAna"><i>mAn</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="maWa"><i>maW</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="moda"><i>mod</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="nabeda"><i>nabed</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="nibAha"><i>nibAh</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="niKara"><i>niKar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Ota"><i>Ot</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pahacAna"><i>pahacAn</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pAla"><i>pAl</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="parosa"><i>paros</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PatakAra"><i>PatakAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PEla"><i>PEl</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pila"><i>pil</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Poda"><i>Pod</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="pukAra"><i>pukAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="PuzkAra"><i>PuzkAr</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="razga"><i>razg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="ruka"><i>ruk</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="saja"><i>saj</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="saraka"><i>sarak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="siJa"><i>siJ</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="sisaka"><i>sisak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="sUKa"><i>sUK</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="tahala"><i>tahal</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="taraka"><i>tarak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="tIpa"><i>tIp</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="TUsa"><i>TUs</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uBara"><i>uBar</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uGada"><i>uGad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="uKada"><i>uKad</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="upaja"><i>upaj</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="UzGa"><i>UzG</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="wadapa"><i>wadap</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Wama"><i>Wam</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="warasa"><i>waras</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="wula"><i>wul</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xAga"><i>xAg</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Xamaka"><i>Xamak</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="xeKa"><i>xeK</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
<e lm="Xuna"><i>Xun</i><par n="uT/a__v"/></e>
